Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB497.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVI-BCORPORATE POLITICAL CONTRIBUTIONSSection 1601-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Association." A group of two or more persons, who are not all members of an immediate family, acting in concert."Chief executive officer." The highest-ranking officer or decision-making individual with authority over a corporation's affairs."Contribution." An expenditure to promote or defeat the election or nomination of a candidate to a political office that is made with the authorization or expressed or implied consent of, in cooperation or in concert with or at the request or suggestion of a candidate or committee established to support or oppose a candidate. The term does not include an independent expenditure."Corporation." The following:(1) a domestic or foreign corporation for profit; or (2) a domestic or foreign limited liability company formed under 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 88 (relating to limited liability companies), or under similar laws of another state."Expenditure." As defined in section 1621(d)."Foreign-influenced corporation." The following:(1) A corporation for which at least one of the following conditions is met:(i) a single foreign investor holds, owns, controls or otherwise has direct or indirect beneficial ownership of 1% or more of the total equity, outstanding voting shares, membership units or other applicable ownership interests of the corporation;(ii) two or more foreign investors in aggregate hold, own, control or otherwise have direct or indirect beneficial ownership of 5% or more of the total equity, outstanding voting shares, membership units or other 20250HB0497PN0486 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicable ownership interests of the corporation; or(iii) a foreign investor participates directly or indirectly in the corporation's decision-making process with respect to the corporation's political activities in the United States.(2) The calculation of a person's ownership interest for purposes of paragraph (1)(i) and (ii) shall exclude any portion of the person's direct or indirect beneficial ownership of equity, outstanding voting shares, membership units or otherwise applicable ownership interests of a corporation that are held or owned in a mutual fund based in the United States."Foreign investor." A person that:(1) holds, owns, controls or otherwise has direct or indirect beneficial ownership of equity, outstanding voting shares, membership units or otherwise applicable ownership interests of a corporation; and(2) is any of the following:(i) a government of a foreign country;(ii) a political party organized in a foreign country;(iii) a partnership, association, corporation, organization or other combination of persons organized under the laws of or having its principal place of business in a foreign country;(iv) an individual outside of the United States who is not a citizen or national of the United States and who is not lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States; or(v) a corporation in which a foreign investor holds, 20250HB0497PN0486 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owns, controls or otherwise has directly or indirectly acquired beneficial ownership of equity or voting shares in an amount that is equal to or greater than 50% of the total equity or outstanding voting shares."General treasury money." Money that an association accumulates through membership dues and fees, donations to the association for its general purposes and income from the operation of a business. The term does not include money collected to influence the nomination or election of candidates or to promote or defeat a ballot question."Independent expenditure." As defined in section 1621(e).Section 1602-B. Foreign-influenced corporations.(a) Prohibition.--Notwithstanding section 1633, a foreign-influenced corporation may not make:(1) an expenditure, or offer or agree to make an expenditure, to promote or defeat the candidacy of an individual for nomination, election or appointment to a public office;(2) contributions or expenditures to promote or defeat a ballot question or to support or oppose a question for placement on the ballot;(3) a contribution to a candidate for nomination, election or appointment to a public office or to a candidate's political committee; or(4) a contribution to a political party, political body, State committee or political committee.(b) Other persons.--A foreign-influenced corporation may not make a contribution or donation to any other person with the express or implied condition that the contribution or donation, or any part of the contribution or donation, be used for any of 20250HB0497PN0486 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the purposes prohibited by this section.(c) Associations.--This section does not prohibit donations to an association for its general purposes, such that the funds qualify as general treasury money, nor does it impose any additional limitations on the use of the funds.Section 1603-B. Certification of compliance.A corporation that makes a contribution or expenditure shall submit a certification to the Department of State that the corporation was not a foreign-influenced corporation as of the date the contribution or expenditure was made. The certification shall be submitted within seven business days after the contribution or expenditure is made and shall be signed by the corporation's chief executive officer after reasonable inquiry under penalty of perjury. If the activity requiring certification was a contribution to a political committee or political action committee that makes independent expenditures, the corporation shall additionally provide a copy of the certification to that committee. For purposes of the certification, the corporation shall use due diligence to ascertain beneficial ownership if it is registered on a national securities exchange, as provided under 17 CFR 240.13d-3 (relating to determination of beneficial owner) and 240.13d-5 (relating to acquisition of beneficial ownership). The corporation shall provide a copy of the statement of certification to any candidate or committee to which it contributes and, upon request of the recipient, to any other person to which it contributes.Section 1604-B. News media.This article does not prohibit publication or broadcasting of news items or editorial comments by the news media.20250HB0497PN0486 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1605-B. Penalty for individuals.(a) Civil penalty.--An officer, manager, stockholder, member, agent, employee, attorney or other representative of a corporation acting on behalf of the corporation who violates this article shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to 10 times the amount of the violation, but in no case more than $10,000, imposed by the Department of State.(b) Fine and imprisonment.--An officer, manager, stockholder, member, agent, employee, attorney or other representative of a corporation acting on behalf of the corporation who is convicted of knowingly violating this article is subject to a fine of not more than $20,000, or imprisonment for a term of not more than five years, or both.Section 1606-B. Penalty for corporations.(a) Civil penalty.--A corporation that violates this article is subject to a civil penalty of up to 10 times the amount of the violation, but in no case more than $10,000, imposed by the court or Department of State.(b) Fines and other penalties.--A corporation convicted of knowingly violating this article is subject to a fine of not more than $40,000. A convicted domestic corporation may be dissolved as well as fined. If a foreign or nonresident corporation is convicted, in addition to the fine, the corporation's right to do business in this Commonwealth may be declared forfeited.Section 1607-B. Knowing violations.An individual or a corporation knowingly violates this article if, at the time of a transaction, the individual or the corporation knew that:(1) the transaction causing the violation constituted a 20250HB0497PN0486 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contribution; and(2) the contributor was a foreign-influenced corporation subject to the prohibitions of section 1602-B.Section 1608-B. Permitted activity.It is not a violation of this article for:(1) A political party or political body to form a nonprofit corporation for the sole purpose of holding real property to be used exclusively as the party's headquarters.(2) A corporation to contribute to or conduct public media projects to encourage individuals to register to vote or vote if the projects are not controlled by or operated for the advantage of a candidate, political party, political body or political committee.(3) A corporation to provide meeting facilities to a political committee, political party, political body or candidate on a nondiscriminatory and nonpreferential basis.(4) A corporation selling products or services to the public to post on its public premises messages that promote participation, voter registration or elections if the messages are not controlled by or operated for the advantage of a candidate, political party, political body or political committee.Section 1609-B. Aiding violation.(a) Individuals.--An individual who aids, abets or advises a violation of this article commits a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $1,000 nor more than $10,000.(b) Director, officers, agents and employees.--A director, officer, agent or employee of a corporation or unincorporated association who aids, abets or advises a violation of this 20250HB0497PN0486 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 article commits a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding $10,000, or to undergo a term of imprisonment of not more than two years, or both, in the discretion of the court.Section 1610-B. Prosecutions, jurisdiction and venue.(a) Jurisdiction.--The Attorney General shall have prosecutorial jurisdiction over all violations committed under this article.(b) Concurrent jurisdiction.--The district attorney of any county in which a violation occurs has concurrent powers and responsibilities with the Attorney General over violations.(c) Venue.--Violations of this article may be prosecuted in the county where the payment or contribution was made, where services were rendered or where money was paid or distributed.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0497PN0486 - 8 - 123456789101112131415